District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.55

Organization.

There are established 4 primary organizational functions in the Office as follows:

(1)

(A)

The Office of the Director, Office of Unified Communications shall include the staff and organizational units needed to develop plans and policies for, and oversee the execution of, the District’s radio technology, call center technology, and customer service policies and operations, and to carry out the administrative functions of the Office of Unified Communications.

(B)

The administrative functions of the Office of Unified Communications shall include human resources, training, legal services, budget and financial management, procurement, facilities management, and such other general and administrative functions as the Director deems necessary to support and assist the functions and purposes of the Office of Unified Communications. The Director may provide for the execution of administrative functions either by hiring full-time personnel or by entering into memoranda of understanding with other departments and agencies of the District that provide for the sharing of administrative personnel between the departments and agencies and the Office.

(C)

The Office of the Director, Office of United Communications shall also include one or more positions designated as liaisons with the agencies to ensure that the functions of the Office effectively support and coordinate with the functions of the agencies.

(2)

Call Center Operations shall carry out all of the customer service functions of the Office.

(3)

Radio and Call Center Technology Support Services shall provide direct assistance and support to the agencies and other departments and agencies of the District regarding the implementation and operation of radio technology and call center technology. Radio and Call Center Technology Support Services shall also provide procurement and contract oversight and assistance for radio technology and call center technology, maintain standard radio technology and call center technology contracts that all District departments and agencies may use, and manage radio technology and call center technology contracts and systems throughout the District government.

(4)

Radio and Call Center Technology Technical Services shall provide support for public safety voice radio and public safety wireless base station and field devices, including voice communications, data communications, and associated network trunking equipment and appurtenances, and identify cost savings, operational efficiencies, and ways to improve radio technology and call center technology services.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3206, 51 DCR 8441